Hawaii statutes.
§46-15.1 Housing; county powers. [Repeal
and reenactment on July 1, 2019. L 2015, c 102, §§3, 4; L 2016, c 55,
§50.] (a) Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any
county shall have and may exercise the same powers, subject to applicable
limitations, as those granted the Hawaii housing finance and development
corporation pursuant to chapter 201H insofar as those powers may be reasonably
construed to be exercisable by a county for the purpose of developing,
constructing, and providing low- and moderate-income housing; provided that no
county shall be empowered to cause the State to issue general obligation bonds
to finance a project pursuant to this section; provided further that county
projects shall be granted an exemption from general excise or receipts taxes in
the same manner as projects of the Hawaii housing finance and development
corporation pursuant to section 201H-36; and provided further that section
201H-16 shall not apply to this section unless federal guidelines specifically
provide local governments with that authorization and the authorization does
not conflict with any state laws. The powers shall include the power, subject
to applicable limitations, to:

(1) Develop and construct dwelling units, alone or in
partnership with developers;

(2) Acquire necessary land by lease, purchase,
exchange, or eminent domain;

(3) Provide assistance and aid to a public agency or
other person in developing and constructing new housing and rehabilitating
existing housing for elders of low- and moderate-income, other persons of low-
and moderate-income, and persons displaced by any governmental action, by
making long-term mortgage or interim construction loans available;

(4) Contract with any eligible bidders to provide for
construction of urgently needed housing for persons of low- and
moderate-income;

(5) Guarantee the top twenty-five per cent of the
principal balance of real property mortgage loans, plus interest thereon, made
to qualified borrowers by qualified lenders;

(6) Enter into mortgage guarantee agreements with
appropriate officials of any agency or instrumentality of the United States to
induce those officials to commit to insure or to insure mortgages under the
National Housing Act, as amended;

(7) Make a direct loan to any qualified buyer for the
downpayment required by a private lender to be made by the borrower as a
condition of obtaining a loan from the private lender in the purchase of
residential property;

(8) Provide funds for a share, not to exceed fifty
per cent, of the principal amount of a loan made to a qualified borrower by a
private lender who is unable otherwise to lend the borrower sufficient funds at
reasonable rates in the purchase of residential property; and

(9) Sell or lease completed dwelling units.

For purposes of this section, a limitation is
applicable to the extent that it may reasonably be construed to apply to a
county.

(b) Each county shall recognize housing units
developed by the department of Hawaiian home lands and issue affordable housing
credits to the department of Hawaiian home lands. The credits shall be
transferable and shall be issued on a one-credit for one-unit basis, unless the
housing unit is eligible for additional credits as provided by adopted county
ordinances, rules, or any memoranda of agreement between a county and the
department of Hawaiian home lands. In the event that credits are transferred
by the department of Hawaiian home lands, twenty-five per cent of any monetary
proceeds from the transfer shall be used by the department of Hawaiian home
lands to develop units for rental properties. Credits shall be issued for each
single-family residence, multi-family unit, other residential unit, whether for
purposes of sale or rental, or if allowed under the county's affordable housing
programs, vacant lot, developed by the department of Hawaiian home lands. The
credits may be applied county-wide within the same county in which the credits
were earned to satisfy affordable housing obligations imposed by the county on
market-priced residential and non-residential developments. County-wide or
project-specific requirements for housing class, use, or type; or construction
time for affordable housing units shall not impair, restrict, or condition the
county's obligation to apply the credits in full satisfaction of all county
requirements, whether by rule, ordinance, or particular zoning conditions of a
project. Notwithstanding any provisions herein to the contrary, the department
may enter into a memorandum of agreement with the county of Kauai to establish,
modify, or clarify the conditions for the issuance, transfer, and redemption of
the affordable housing credits in accordance with county affordable housing
ordinances or rules. Notwithstanding any provisions herein to the contrary,
the department may enter into a memorandum of agreement with the city and
county of Honolulu to establish, modify, or clarify the conditions for the
issuance, transfer, and redemption of the affordable housing credits in
accordance with county affordable housing ordinances or rules. At least half
of the affordable housing credits issued by the city and county of Honolulu
shall be subject to a memorandum of agreement pursuant to this subsection.

For purposes of this section, "affordable
housing obligation" means the requirement imposed by a county, regardless
of the date of its imposition, to develop vacant lots, single-family
residences, multi-family residences, or any other type of residence for sale or
rent to individuals within a specified income range.

(c) Any law to the contrary notwithstanding,
any county may:

(1) Authorize and issue bonds under chapter 47 and
chapter 49 to provide moneys to carry out the purposes of this section or
section 46-15.2, including the satisfaction of any guarantees made by the county
pursuant to this section;

(2) Appropriate moneys of the county to carry out the
purposes of this section;

(3) Obtain insurance and guarantees from the State or
the United States, or grants from either;

(4) Designate, after holding a public hearing on the
matter and with the approval of the respective council, any lands owned by it
for the purposes of this section;

(5) Provide interim construction loans to
partnerships of which it is a partner and to developers whose projects qualify
for federally assisted project mortgage insurance, or other similar programs of
federal assistance for persons of low and moderate income; and

(6) Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 as are
necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(d) The provisions of this section shall be
construed liberally so as to effectuate the purpose of this section in
facilitating the development, construction, and provision of low- and
moderate-income housing by the various counties.

(e) For purposes of this section, "low
and moderate income housing" means any housing project that meets the
definition of "low- and moderate-income housing project" in section
39A-281. [L 1974, c 179, §2; am L 1977, c 207, §2; am L 1980, c 190, §1; am L
1981, c 39, §1; am L 1982, c 118, §1; am L 1987, c 80, §1 and c 337, §4; am L
1989, c 69, §2; am L 1990, c 67, §8; am L 1997, c 350, §6; am L 2005, c 196,
§26(b); am L 2006, c 180, §16; am L 2007, c 37, §1 and c 249, §8; am L 2009, c
141, §§1, 3; am L 2012, c 98, §§1, 3; am L 2014, c 96, §11; am L 2015, c 102,
§1]

Note

L 1997, c 350, §§14
and 15 purport to amend this section.

The L 2014, c 96
amendment is exempt from the repeal and reenactment condition of L 2009, c 141,
§3. L 2014, c 96, §23.

Cross References

Concurrent
processing, see §46-15.7.

Facilitated
application process, see §201-62.

Law Journals and Reviews

The Scramble to
Protect the American Dream in Paradise: Is Affordable Housing Possible in
Hawaii? 10 HBJ No. 13, at pg. 37.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next